California, session 20252026, SB917.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 23399.4 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:23399.4. (a) A licensed winegrower may apply to the department for a certified farmers’ market sales permit. A certified farmers’ market sales permit shall authorize the licensee, a member of the licensee’s family, or an employee of the licensee to sell wine at a certified farmers’ market at any place in the state approved by the department. The licensee may only sell wine that is produced entirely from grapes or other agricultural products and that is bottled by the winegrower. In addition, the permit will allow an instructional tasting event by the licensee on the subject of wine at a certified farmers’ market. The permit may be issued for up to 12 months but shall not be valid for more than one day a week at any single specified certified farmers’ market location. A winegrower may hold more than one certified farmers’ market sales permit. The department shall notify the city, county, or city and county and applicable law enforcement agency where the certified farmers’ market is to be held of the issuance of the permit. A “certified farmers’ market” means a location operated in accordance with Chapter 10.5 (commencing with Section 47000) of Division 17 of the Food and Agricultural Code, and the regulations adopted pursuant thereto.(b) (1) An instructional tasting event is subject to the authorization and managerial control of the operator of the certified farmers’ market. The licensee, a member of the licensee’s family, or an employee of the licensee may conduct an instructional tasting event for consumers on the subject of wine at a certified farmers’ market.(2) (A) At all times during an instructional tasting event, the instructional tasting event area shall be separated from the remainder of the market by a wall, rope, cable, cord, chain, fence, or other permanent or temporary barrier. The number of licensees allowed to Only three licensees may conduct an instructional tasting event during the operational hours of a any one certified farmers’ market is subject to the authorization and managerial control of the operator of the certified farmers’ market. market.(B) The licensee shall not permit any consumer to leave the instructional tasting area with an open container of wine.(c) The licensee shall not pour more than three ounces of wine per person per day.(d) The licensed winegrower eligible for the certified farmers’ market sales permit shall not sell more than 5,000 gallons of wine annually pursuant to all certified farmers’ market sales permits held by any single winegrower. The licensed winegrower shall report total certified farmers’ market wine sales to the department on an annual basis. The report may be included within the annual report of production submitted to the department, or pursuant to any regulation as may be prescribed by the department.(e) Except as otherwise provided in this division or by the rules of the department, no premium, gift, free goods, or other thing of value shall be given away by the licensee, a member of the licensee’s family, or an employee of the licensee in connection with an instructional tasting event conducted pursuant to this section that includes tastings of wine.(f) The fee for any permit issued pursuant to this section shall be the annual fee as specified in subdivision (b) of Section 23320.(g) Instructional tastings under a certified farmer’s farmers’ market sales permit shall be subject to RBS training pursuant to Article 4 (commencing with Section 25680) of Chapter 16.